Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2076.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Geothermal Energy Development Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandoned well." As defined in 58 Pa.C.S. § 3203 (relating to definitions)."By-product." Any mineral that is found in solution or in association with geothermal resources and that has a value of less than 75% of the geothermal resource or is not, because of quantity, quality or technical difficulties in extraction and production, of sufficient value to warrant extraction and production by itself. The term does not include helium, hydrogen, oil, hydrocarbon gas or other hydrocarbon substances."Class V Underground Injection Control well." An injection well under a UIC Class V permit that is drilled for the recovery of geothermal energy for heating, cooling, direct-use thermal energy, aquaculture or production of electric power."Conventional well." As the term "well" is defined in 58 Pa.C.S. § 3203.20250HB2076PN3176 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Exploratory well." A borehole drilled as a geophysical test well, seismic shot hole, mineral exploration drilling, core drilling or temperature gradient test well and drilled in prospecting for geothermal resources. The term does not include a geothermal well or repurposed well."Fund." The Geothermal Energy Development Fund established under section 14(a) 15(A)."Geothermal energy project." A project that involves the production or extraction of a geothermal resource from a geothermal system through one or more geothermal wells or repurposed wells."Geothermal fluid." Naturally occurring groundwater, brine, vapor, steam and other fluid artificially introduced into geothermal formations."Geothermal operation." The term includes any of the following activities related to the operation of a geothermal well or repurposed well:(1) conducting geophysical operations;(2) drilling;(3) siting;(4) installing and operating flow lines;(5) deepening;(6) recompleting;(7) reworking;(8) repurposing;(9) plugging and abandoning; and(10) any construction, site preparation, disposing of geothermal wastes or reclaiming activities associated with 20250HB2076PN3176 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the activities included in this term."Geothermal resource." The natural heat of the earth at temperatures greater than 40º Celsius and the energy, in whatever form, below the surface of the earth present in, resulting from, created by or that may be extracted from, the natural heat and all minerals in solution or other products obtained from naturally heated fluids, brines, associated gases and steam, in whatever form, found below the surface of the earth, exclusive of helium, oil, hydrocarbon gas or other hydrocarbon substances. The term specifically includes:(1) all products of geothermal processes, including formation steam, hot water and hot brines;(2) steam and other gases, hot water and hot brines resulting from water, gas or other fluids artificially introduced into geothermal formations;(3) heat or other associated energy found in geothermal formations; and(4) any by-product derived from any item listed under paragraph (1), (2) or (3)."Geothermal system." Any strata, pool, reservoir or other geologic formation containing geothermal resources."Geothermal well." A borehole drilled or being drilled for the purpose of or to be used for production of geothermal resources, including for electricity production, heating and cooling. The term includes a Class V Underground Injection Control well drilled for the purpose of producing geothermal resources. The term does not include a borehole drilled at or less than 5,000 feet below the surface which is primarily intended for geothermal heat pumps to provide heating or cooling to one or multiple buildings.20250HB2076PN3176 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Person." An individual, partnership, association, company, corporation, municipality, municipal authority, Federal or Commonwealth administrative agency or an entity that is recognized by law as the subject of rights and obligations. The term includes the officers, employees and agents of any legal entity."Public land." Land that is owned or managed by the Commonwealth, a municipality or an agency, authority or other governmental entity of the Commonwealth or a municipality."Repurposed well." An existing conventional well, unconventional well or abandoned well originally intended for oil and gas production which is repurposed into a geothermal well for geothermal energy production or for the cogeneration of geothermal energy or geothermal resources with oil and gas production, regardless of formation temperature or depth."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Subsurface property interest owner." A property interest owner identified by the records of the recorder of deeds for each county containing a portion of the proposed geothermal energy project who holds a fee simple interest, other freehold interest or leasehold interest in the subsurface of the property, which may include minerals, including coal, oil and gas rights or pore space rights for carbon or natural gas storage. The term does not include the owner of a right-of-way or an easement."Surface property interest owner." A property interest owner identified by the records of the recorder of deeds for each county containing a portion of the proposed geothermal energy project who holds a fee simple interest or other freehold 20250HB2076PN3176 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest in the surface of the property, which may include minerals, including coal, oil and gas rights or pore space rights for carbon or natural gas storage. The term does not include the owner of a right-of-way, an easement or a leasehold."UIC Class V permit." A permit issued under 40 CFR Pt. 144 (relating to Underground Injection Control Program) and regulations promulgated by the Environmental Quality Board that allows the operation of a Class V Underground Injection Control well drilled for the purpose of producing geothermal resources."Unconventional well." As defined in 58 Pa.C.S. § 3203."Well operator." An individual, corporation or other legal entity that operates a geothermal energy project.Section 3. Powers and duties.The department shall have the powers and duties to regulate geothermal energy projects and the exploration, development and production of geothermal wells on public and private land for the purpose of facilitating optimal geothermal resource production while protecting public safety, the environment and natural resources. THE ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY BOARD SHALL HAVE THE POWER AND DUTY TO PROMULGATE RULES AND REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT.Section 4. Ownership of geothermal resources.(a) General ownership.--The ownership of all geothermal resources in all strata below the surface lands and waters of this Commonwealth shall be vested in the surface property interest owner above the geothermal resources subject to any preexisting rights.(b) Conveyance.--Subject to any preexisting rights, a conveyance of the surface ownership of real property shall be a conveyance of the geothermal resources in all strata below the 20250HB2076PN3176 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surface of the real property unless the ownership interest in the geothermal resources previously has been expressly excepted and reserved, conveyed or otherwise severed from the surface ownership. The ownership of geothermal resources in strata may be conveyed in the manner provided by law for the transfer of real property interests.(c) Right to access.--The surface property interest owner and the owner's lessee, heir or assignee shall be entitled to drill for and produce energy derived from the geothermal resources, subject to any preexisting rights. The surface property interest owner, unless otherwise expressly conveyed, and its operator, shall comply with all applicable environmental laws and regulations administered by the department when drilling or producing geothermal resources.(d) Transparency.--A lease or conveyance of a geothermal resource under any public land for the primary purpose of exploring or producing energy from geothermal resources may not be made without public notice, hearing and a reasonable opportunity for public comment.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall alter, amend, diminish or invalidate rights to an existing use of subsurface geothermal resources that were acquired by contract or lease prior to the effective date of this paragraph, notwithstanding that the contract or lease was entered into with a subsurface property interest owner or a predecessor to the subsurface property interest owner or with a pore space owner.Section 5. Authorization of projects.(a) Resource production.--Geothermal energy projects are authorized in this Commonwealth, including for the purposes of electricity production, heating and cooling. The Environmental 20250HB2076PN3176 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Quality Board, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Geological Survey, may promulgate regulations if necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to facilitate optimal geothermal resource production while protecting the Commonwealth's natural resources and public health, safety and welfare.(b) Right to inspect.--Upon issuance of a permit to construct or operate a geothermal energy project, the department may enter onto private or public land, with proper identification, to inspect any geothermal energy project to determine if the project is being constructed, operated or maintained in compliance with all applicable permits and environmental laws or to investigate any unreasonable risk to public health, property, natural resources or the environment.(c) Conditions for authorization.--To operate a geothermal energy project under this section, a well operator must obtain a geothermal well permit issued by the department. The following shall apply:(1) The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate regulations and permitting criteria necessary to protect the Commonwealth's natural resources and public health, safety and welfare, to which the following shall apply:(i) The regulations shall consider community impact analysis, including setback considerations, in permitting for geothermal energy projects.(ii) The department may condition or deny a permit based on the criteria specified in the regulations.(iii) The regulations shall include specific permitting criteria for repurposed wells and exploratory wells.(2) In a decision to issue a final permit for a 20250HB2076PN3176 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 geothermal well within a census tract with an environmental exposure score in the 80th percentile or greater using the PennEnviroScreen tool provided by the department, the department may require reasonable additional impact assessments, public participation, transparency and reporting measures as part of a permit review or approval.(3) The department may charge a permit fee or periodic management fee sufficient to maintain oversight and enforcement for geothermal energy projects in this Commonwealth, not to exceed comparable fees set for the purpose of oil and gas production from an unconventional, conventional or carbon dioxide injection well, unless the department demonstrates that such fees are necessary to maintain oversight and enforcement based on specific well characteristics such as loop system type, type of energy generated and depth. The fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the fund.(4) The department shall consider the establishment of an expedited permitting process for a person holding an existing well permit under 58 Pa.C.S. § 3211 (relating to well permits) to obtain a permit under this section.(5) For geothermal energy projects stimulated by any form of hydraulic fracturing or repurposing of an existing well that involves hydraulic fracturing operations, the department shall consider the environmental risks and may instead require the operator to seek an unconventional well permit consistent with 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 Subch. B (relating to general requirements) or to comply with additional permit conditions consistent with section 6.(6) Upon submission of a permit application, a well 20250HB2076PN3176 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operator shall provide notice of application to the surface property interest owners and subsurface property interest owners within a quarter mile of the well bore or other prescribed area of review of the geothermal operation as determined by the department.(7) (i) To operate a geothermal energy project under this section, a well operator shall design the geothermal energy project as much as practicable to isolate any existing or future production from the commercially valuable material, including of the coal or oil and gas estate, from the subsurface geothermal production area and shall indicate whether it contains commercially valuable mineral, including the coal or oil and gas estates and, if it does, a permit may be issued only if the department is satisfied that the interests of the mineral, including coal or oil and gas estate, will not be adversely affected and the subsurface property interest owners have been notified by the operator.(ii) If a subsurface property interest owner is a producer of a commercially valuable mineral, including coal or oil and gas, the well operator shall notify the subsurface property interest owner in writing and submit a copy of the notice to the department. If, upon receipt of the notice, the subsurface property interest owners express an objection to the department to the design of the geothermal energy project based on the potential adverse effect to a commercially valuable mineral, including the coal or oil and gas estate, the operator shall address the objection to the satisfaction of the department.20250HB2076PN3176 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) No right to action shall arise with respect to this paragraph if an operator addresses the objection under subparagraph (ii) to the satisfaction of the department in good faith.(d) Dispute resolution.--The department or any person having a direct interest in a matter subject to this act may, at any time, request that a conference be held to discuss and attempt to resolve by mutual agreement a matter arising under this act. The following shall apply:(1) Unless otherwise provided, conferences shall be held within 90 days after a request is received by the department and notice shall be given by the department to all interested parties.(2) A representative of the department shall attend the conference and the department may make recommendations.(3) An agreement reached at a conference shall be consistent with this act and, if approved by the department, the agreement shall be reduced to writing and shall be effective unless reviewed and rejected by the department within 10 days after the conference.(4) The record of an agreement approved by the department shall be kept on file by the department and copies shall be furnished to the parties.(5) The scheduling of a conference shall have no effect on the department's authority to issue orders to compel compliance with this act.(e) Class V injection wells.--To operate a Class V Underground Injection Control well for the purpose of producing geothermal resources, a well operator shall obtain a UIC Class V permit or permit-by-rule status and all other permits as 20250HB2076PN3176 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required by applicable statutes and regulations.(f) Oil and gas well conversion.--Upon issuance of all necessary permits for a repurposed well, a person may repurpose any existing conventional or unconventional well, including an abandoned well, for the cogeneration of geothermal resources or geothermal energy with oil and gas production or the production or use of geothermal resources or geothermal energy for heating, cooling or electricity production, regardless of depth or temperature. The department may revoke an issued permit under this section if it has been determined that a well operator is knowingly or intentionally attempting to avoid the fulfillment of obligations under 58 Pa.C.S. § 3220 (relating to plugging requirements).(g) Exploratory wells.--Upon issuance of a permit and receiving permission from the surface property interest owner, a person or well operator may drill an exploratory well to identify potential viability for geothermal resource production below the surface of the real property.Section 6. Regulations.The Environmental Quality Board shall, for purposes of regulating geothermal wells and geothermal operations under this act, promulgate regulations to:(1) Establish siting, design and other technical specifications and requirements.(2) Determine performance criteria for repurposed wells to prevent delayed well plugging or improper abandonment.(3) Require the spacing, drilling, casing, testing, operating, producing, plugging and decommissioning of geothermal wells and repurposed wells to prevent:(i) geothermal resources, water, gases or other 20250HB2076PN3176 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fluids from escaping into strata other than where it is found, unless in accordance with a UIC Class V permit and approved by the department;(ii) pollution of surface and groundwater, including wastewater management during well development or production;(iii) premature cooling of any geothermal system by water encroachment or other means that reduce the economic recovery of the geothermal resources;(iv) blowouts, explosions, fires, cave-ins and seepage;(v) unreasonable disturbance or injury to surrounding property, existing water rights, public health and the environment; and(vi) orphaning or abandoning wells without proper site remediation and well plugging.(4) Establish a decommissioning process for plugging and abandoning a geothermal well, repurposed well and exploratory well.(5) Establish bonding or other financial security requirements for well operators drilling a geothermal well, repurposed well or exploratory well. The following shall apply:(i) Regardless of the well depth or drilling technique, the department shall have the authority to set bonding or other financial security requirements in amounts deemed appropriate by the department to remediate the wells and protect the environment, public health and safety.(ii) The operator shall file cash or individual 20250HB2076PN3176 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bonds for each new geothermal well, repurposed well or exploratory well drilled and each abandoned well redrilled.(iii) In lieu of separate well bonds, the operator may file a blanket cash or individual bond in an amount determined by the department to cover the well operator's drilling, maintenance or plugging and decommissioning activities for wells in this Commonwealth.(iv) Any bond or other financial security filed with the department may be terminated or canceled with the consent of the department.(v) The surety may be relieved of all obligations when the covered well or wells have been properly decommissioned or it has been replaced by another valid bond.(vi) No bond shall exceed a comparable bond set for an unconventional, conventional or carbon dioxide injection well unless the department demonstrates that the fees are necessary to maintain oversight and enforcement based on specific well characteristics.(6) Determine criteria necessary to release bonding or other financial assurance.(7) Establish reasonable fees, not to exceed comparable fees set for unconventional, conventional or carbon dioxide injection wells unless the department demonstrates that the fees are necessary to maintain oversight and enforcement based on specific well characteristics, to cover the costs incurred by the department to administer the provisions of this act.(8) Establish a process to suspend operations, shut-in a 20250HB2076PN3176 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 geothermal well or repurposed well and remove equipment from a well if the department has determined the operator is in violation of any rules or regulations established under this act or other environmental laws of this Commonwealth.(9) Determine well reporting, recordkeeping and other appropriate disclosure requirements for well operators to file with the department. The department shall require:(i) identification of the location and ownership of all wells and producing geothermal leases;(ii) filing a notice of intent to drill, redrill, deepen, permanently alter the casing of a well or abandon any well. A notice of intent must be approved by the department prior to commencement of operations;(iii) keeping of well logs, including temperature and depth data, and filing accurate copies with the department; and(iv) filing any other reasonable reports regarding geothermal operations in this Commonwealth.(10) Determine criteria for geothermal wells or repurposed wells stimulated by any form of hydraulic fracturing, including any appropriate provisions or regulations under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 Subch. B (relating to general requirements), if the department determines it is necessary to prevent groundwater contamination or other environmental harms.SECTION 5. AUTHORIZATION OF PROJECTS.(A) RESOURCE PRODUCTION.--GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECTS ARE AUTHORIZED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING FOR THE PURPOSES OF ELECTRICITY PRODUCTION, HEATING AND COOLING. TO OPERATE A GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT UNDER THIS ACT, A WELL OPERATOR MUST 20250HB2076PN3176 - 15 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OBTAIN A GEOTHERMAL WELL PERMIT ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(B) RIGHT TO INSPECT.--UPON ISSUANCE OF A PERMIT TO CONSTRUCT OR OPERATE A GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER ONTO PRIVATE OR PUBLIC LAND, WITH PROPER IDENTIFICATION, TO INSPECT A GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT TO DETERMINE IF THE PROJECT IS BEING CONSTRUCTED, OPERATED OR MAINTAINED IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE PERMITS AND ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS OR TO INVESTIGATE ANY UNREASONABLE RISK TO PUBLIC HEALTH, PROPERTY, NATURAL RESOURCES OR THE ENVIRONMENT.(C) CLASS V INJECTION WELLS.--TO OPERATE A CLASS V UNDERGROUND INJECTION CONTROL WELL FOR THE PURPOSE OF PRODUCING GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES, A WELL OPERATOR SHALL OBTAIN A UIC CLASS V PERMIT, OR PERMIT-BY-RULE STATUS, AND ALL OTHER PERMITS AS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE STATUTES AND REGULATIONS.(D) OIL AND GAS WELL CONVERSION.--UPON ISSUANCE OF ALL NECESSARY PERMITS FOR A REPURPOSED WELL, A PERSON MAY REPURPOSE AN EXISTING CONVENTIONAL OR UNCONVENTIONAL WELL, INCLUDING AN ABANDONED WELL, FOR THE COGENERATION OF GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES OR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY WITH OIL AND GAS PRODUCTION OR THE PRODUCTION OR USE OF GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES OR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY FOR HEATING, COOLING OR ELECTRICITY PRODUCTION, REGARDLESS OF DEPTH OR TEMPERATURE. THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A WELL OPERATOR IS KNOWINGLY OR INTENTIONALLY ATTEMPTING TO AVOID THE FULFILLMENT OF OBLIGATIONS UNDER 58 PA.C.S. § 3220 (RELATING TO PLUGGING REQUIREMENTS).(E) EXPLORATORY WELLS.--UPON ISSUANCE OF A PERMIT BY THE DEPARTMENT, A PERSON MAY DRILL AN EXPLORATORY WELL TO IDENTIFY POTENTIAL VIABILITY FOR GEOTHERMAL RESOURCE PRODUCTION BELOW THE SURFACE OF THE REAL PROPERTY.20250HB2076PN3176 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 6. REGULATIONS.(A) WELL SAFETY AND PERMIT REQUIREMENTS.--FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROTECTING THE COMMONWEALTH'S NATURAL RESOURCES AND PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY AND WELFARE, THE ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY BOARD SHALL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY, PROMULGATE REGULATIONS TO:(1) ESTABLISH PERMITTING CRITERIA FOR WELL OPERATORS, INCLUDING SPECIFIC PERMITTING CRITERIA FOR REPURPOSED WELLS AND EXPLORATORY WELLS.(2) CONSIDER COMMUNITY IMPACT ANALYSIS, INCLUDING SETBACK CONSIDERATIONS, IN PERMITTING FOR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECTS.(3) ESTABLISH SITING, DESIGN AND OTHER TECHNICAL SPECIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS.(4) DETERMINE PERFORMANCE CRITERIA FOR REPURPOSED WELLS TO PREVENT DELAYED WELL PLUGGING OR IMPROPER ABANDONMENT.(5) REQUIRE THE SPACING, DRILLING, CASING, TESTING, OPERATING, PRODUCING, PLUGGING AND DECOMMISSIONING OF GEOTHERMAL WELLS AND REPURPOSED WELLS TO PREVENT:(I) GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES, WATER, GASES OR OTHER FLUIDS FROM ESCAPING INTO STRATA OTHER THAN WHERE IT IS FOUND, UNLESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH A UIC CLASS V PERMIT AND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(II) POLLUTION OF SURFACE AND GROUNDWATER, INCLUDING WASTEWATER MANAGEMENT DURING WELL DEVELOPMENT OR PRODUCTION.(III) PREMATURE COOLING OF ANY GEOTHERMAL SYSTEM BY WATER ENCROACHMENT OR OTHER MEANS THAT REDUCE THE ECONOMIC RECOVERY OF THE GEOTHERMAL RESOURCES.(IV) BLOWOUTS, EXPLOSIONS, FIRES, CAVE-INS AND 20250HB2076PN3176 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SEEPAGE.(V) UNREASONABLE DISTURBANCE OR INJURY TO SURROUNDING PROPERTY, EXISTING WATER RIGHTS, PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT.(VI) ORPHANING OR ABANDONING WELLS WITHOUT PROPER SITE REMEDIATION AND WELL PLUGGING.(6) ESTABLISH A DECOMMISSIONING PROCESS FOR PLUGGING AND ABANDONING A GEOTHERMAL WELL, REPURPOSED WELL AND EXPLORATORY WELL.(7) ESTABLISH BONDING OR OTHER FINANCIAL SECURITY REQUIREMENTS FOR WELL OPERATORS DRILLING A GEOTHERMAL WELL, REPURPOSED WELL OR EXPLORATORY WELL. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) REGARDLESS OF THE WELL DEPTH OR DRILLING TECHNIQUE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO SET BONDING OR OTHER FINANCIAL SECURITY REQUIREMENTS IN AMOUNTS DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE DEPARTMENT TO REMEDIATE THE WELLS AND PROTECT THE ENVIRONMENT, PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.(II) THE WELL OPERATOR SHALL FILE CASH OR INDIVIDUAL BONDS FOR EACH NEW GEOTHERMAL WELL, REPURPOSED WELL OR EXPLORATORY WELL DRILLED AND EACH ABANDONED WELL REDRILLED.(III) IN LIEU OF SEPARATE WELL BONDS, THE WELL OPERATOR MAY FILE A BLANKET CASH OR INDIVIDUAL BOND IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO COVER THE WELL OPERATOR'S DRILLING, MAINTENANCE OR PLUGGING AND DECOMMISSIONING ACTIVITIES FOR WELLS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(IV) ANY BOND OR OTHER FINANCIAL SECURITY FILED WITH 20250HB2076PN3176 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE DEPARTMENT MAY BE TERMINATED OR CANCELED WITH THE CONSENT OF THE DEPARTMENT.(V) THE SURETY MAY BE RELIEVED OF ALL OBLIGATIONS WHEN THE COVERED WELL OR WELLS HAVE BEEN PROPERLY DECOMMISSIONED OR IT HAS BEEN REPLACED BY ANOTHER VALID BOND.(VI) A BOND MAY NOT EXCEED A COMPARABLE BOND SET FOR AN UNCONVENTIONAL, CONVENTIONAL OR CARBON DIOXIDE INJECTION WELL UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT DEMONSTRATES THAT THE FEES ARE NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN OVERSIGHT AND ENFORCEMENT BASED ON SPECIFIC WELL CHARACTERISTICS.(8) DETERMINE CRITERIA NECESSARY TO RELEASE BONDING OR OTHER FINANCIAL ASSURANCE.(9) ESTABLISH REASONABLE FEES, NOT TO EXCEED COMPARABLE FEES, SET FOR UNCONVENTIONAL, CONVENTIONAL OR CARBON DIOXIDE INJECTION WELLS UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT DEMONSTRATES THAT THE FEES ARE NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN OVERSIGHT AND ENFORCEMENT BASED ON SPECIFIC WELL CHARACTERISTICS TO COVER THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ADMINISTER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT.(10) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO SUSPEND OPERATIONS, SHUT-IN A GEOTHERMAL WELL OR REPURPOSED WELL AND REMOVE EQUIPMENT FROM A WELL IF THE DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED THE WELL OPERATOR IS IN VIOLATION OF ANY RULES OR REGULATIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS ACT OR OTHER LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(11) DETERMINE WELL REPORTING, RECORDKEEPING AND OTHER APPROPRIATE DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS FOR WELL OPERATORS TO FILE WITH THE DEPARTMENT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE:(I) IDENTIFICATION OF THE LOCATION AND OWNERSHIP OF 20250HB2076PN3176 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALL WELLS AND PRODUCING GEOTHERMAL LEASES.(II) FILING A NOTICE OF INTENT TO DRILL, REDRILL, DEEPEN, PERMANENTLY ALTER THE CASING OF A WELL OR ABANDON ANY WELL. A NOTICE OF INTENT MUST BE APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO COMMENCEMENT OF OPERATIONS.(III) KEEPING OF WELL LOGS, INCLUDING TEMPERATURE AND DEPTH DATA, AND FILING ACCURATE COPIES WITH THE DEPARTMENT.(IV) FILING ANY OTHER REASONABLE REPORTS REGARDING GEOTHERMAL OPERATIONS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(12) DETERMINE CRITERIA FOR GEOTHERMAL WELLS OR REPURPOSED WELLS STIMULATED BY ANY FORM OF HYDRAULIC FRACTURING, INCLUDING ANY APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS OR REGULATIONS UNDER 58 PA.C.S. CH. 32 SUBCH. B (RELATING TO GENERAL REQUIREMENTS), IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IT IS NECESSARY TO PREVENT GROUNDWATER CONTAMINATION OR OTHER ENVIRONMENTAL HARMS.(B) PERMIT DENIAL.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONDITION OR DENY A PERMIT BASED ON THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN THE REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION.(C) WELL IMPACT REVIEW.--IN A DECISION TO ISSUE A FINAL PERMIT FOR A GEOTHERMAL WELL WITHIN A CENSUS TRACT WITH AN ENVIRONMENTAL EXPOSURE SCORE IN THE 80TH PERCENTILE OR GREATER USING THE PENNENVIROSCREEN TOOL PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE REASONABLE ADDITIONAL IMPACT ASSESSMENTS, PUBLIC PARTICIPATION, TRANSPARENCY AND REPORTING MEASURES AS PART OF A PERMIT REVIEW OR APPROVAL.(D) DEPARTMENT FEES.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A PERMIT FEE OR PERIODIC MANAGEMENT FEE SUFFICIENT TO MAINTAIN OVERSIGHT AND 20250HB2076PN3176 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENFORCEMENT FOR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECTS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, NOT TO EXCEED COMPARABLE FEES SET FOR THE PURPOSE OF OIL AND GAS PRODUCTION FROM AN UNCONVENTIONAL, CONVENTIONAL OR CARBON DIOXIDE INJECTION WELL, UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT DEMONSTRATES THAT THE FEES ARE NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN OVERSIGHT AND ENFORCEMENT BASED ON SPECIFIC WELL CHARACTERISTICS SUCH AS LOOP SYSTEM TYPE, TYPE OF ENERGY GENERATED AND DEPTH. THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND.(E) EXPEDITED PERMITS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN EXPEDITED PERMITTING PROCESS FOR A PERSON HOLDING AN EXISTING WELL PERMIT UNDER 58 PA.C.S. § 3211 (RELATING TO WELL PERMITS) TO OBTAIN A PERMIT UNDER THIS SECTION.(F) HYDRAULIC FRACTURING.--FOR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECTS STIMULATED BY ANY FORM OF HYDRAULIC FRACTURING OR REPURPOSING OF AN EXISTING WELL THAT INVOLVES HYDRAULIC FRACTURING OPERATIONS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER THE ENVIRONMENTAL RISKS AND MAY INSTEAD REQUIRE THE WELL OPERATOR TO SEEK AN UNCONVENTIONAL WELL PERMIT UNDER 58 PA.C.S. CH. 32 SUBCH. B OR TO COMPLY WITH ADDITIONAL PERMIT CONDITIONS CONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (A).SECTION 7. ESTATE OWNER OBJECTIONS AND PROCEDURES.(A) NOTICE.--UPON SUBMISSION OF A PERMIT APPLICATION, A WELL OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF APPLICATION TO THE SURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNERS WITHIN 1,500 FEET OF THE WELL BORE.(B) WELL DESIGN.--TO OPERATE A GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT UNDER THIS SECTION, A WELL OPERATOR SHALL DESIGN THE GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT AS MUCH AS PRACTICABLE TO ISOLATE ANY EXISTING OR FUTURE PRODUCTION FROM THE COMMERCIALLY VALUABLE MATERIAL, INCLUDING OF THE COAL OR OIL AND GAS ESTATE, FROM THE SUBSURFACE GEOTHERMAL PRODUCTION AREA AND SHALL INDICATE WHETHER A 20250HB2076PN3176 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT CONTAINS COMMERCIALLY VALUABLE MINERAL, INCLUDING THE COAL OR OIL AND GAS ESTATES AND, IF IT DOES, A PERMIT MAY BE ISSUED ONLY IF THE DEPARTMENT IS SATISFIED THAT THE INTERESTS OF THE MINERAL, INCLUDING COAL OR OIL AND GAS ESTATE, WILL NOT BE ADVERSELY AFFECTED AND THE SUBSURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNERS HAVE BEEN NOTIFIED BY THE WELL OPERATOR.(C) OBJECTIONS.--IF A SUBSURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNER IS A PRODUCER OF A COMMERCIALLY VALUABLE MINERAL, INCLUDING COAL OR OIL AND GAS, THE WELL OPERATOR SHALL NOTIFY THE SUBSURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNER IN WRITING AND SUBMIT A COPY OF THE NOTICE TO THE DEPARTMENT. IF, UPON RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE, THE SUBSURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNERS EXPRESS AN OBJECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT TO THE DESIGN OF THE GEOTHERMAL ENERGY PROJECT BASED ON THE POTENTIAL ADVERSE EFFECT TO A COMMERCIALLY VALUABLE MINERAL, INCLUDING THE COAL OR OIL AND GAS ESTATE, THE WELL OPERATOR SHALL ADDRESS THE OBJECTION TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT.(D) RIGHT TO ACTION PROHIBITED.--(1) NO RIGHT TO ACTION SHALL ARISE WITH RESPECT TO THIS SECTION IF A WELL OPERATOR ADDRESSES THE OBJECTION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT IN GOOD FAITH.(2) A DETERMINATION BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT THE OPERATOR HAS SATISFACTORILY ADDRESSED THE OBJECTION SHALL BE A DEPARTMENTAL ACTION APPEALABLE BY THE SUBSURFACE PROPERTY INTEREST OWNER WHO HAS RAISED THE OBJECTION TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD, AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 4 OF THE ACT OF JULY 13, 1988 (P.L.530, NO.94), KNOWN AS THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD ACT. THE APPEAL MUST BE FILED IN 20250HB2076PN3176 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES FOR FILING AN APPEAL OF A FINAL AGENCY ACTION WITH THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD AND NO LATER THAN 30 DAYS FOLLOWING RECEIPT OF NOTICE THAT THE OBJECTION HAS BEEN SATISFIED.(E) DISPUTE RESOLUTION.--THE DEPARTMENT, OR ANY PERSON HAVING A DIRECT INTEREST IN A MATTER SUBJECT TO THIS ACT, MAY, AT ANY TIME, REQUEST THAT A CONFERENCE BE HELD TO DISCUSS AND ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE BY MUTUAL AGREEMENT A MATTER ARISING UNDER THIS ACT. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED, CONFERENCES SHALL BE HELD WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER A REQUEST IS RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND NOTICE SHALL BE GIVEN BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ALL INTERESTED PARTIES.(2) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ATTEND THE CONFERENCE AND THE DEPARTMENT MAY MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS.(3) AN AGREEMENT REACHED AT A CONFERENCE SHALL BE CONSISTENT WITH THIS ACT AND, IF APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE AGREEMENT SHALL BE REDUCED TO WRITING AND SHALL BE EFFECTIVE UNLESS REVIEWED AND REJECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE CONFERENCE.(4) THE RECORD OF AN AGREEMENT APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE BY THE DEPARTMENT AND COPIES SHALL BE FURNISHED TO THE PARTIES.(5) THE SCHEDULING OF A CONFERENCE SHALL HAVE NO EFFECT ON THE DEPARTMENT'S AUTHORITY TO ISSUE ORDERS TO COMPEL COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ACT.Section 7 8. Geothermal resource units.The Environmental Quality Board may promulgate rules and regulations to establish geothermal resource units applicable to geothermal resources. When promulgating regulations, the 20250HB2076PN3176 - 23 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may:(1) control well spacing and production rates;(2) control the quantity of geothermal fluid extracted from geothermal resources by methods and procedures determined by the department, including requirements to reinject;(3) adopt a comprehensive unit plan that encourages sustainable use of geothermal resources; and(4) require equitable compensation for any impacted owner of a geothermal resource.Section 8 9. Liability of a well operator.A well operator or individual drilling an exploratory well shall be liable to any person or agency that sustains damages from failure of the operator or individual to comply with any of the following:(1) A permit condition provided under section 5(c) IMPOSED UNDER THIS ACT.(2) Any rules or regulations established by the Environmental Quality Board under this act.(3) Any environmental law administered by the department.Section 9 10. Public nuisances.A violation of this act or an order or regulation under this act constitutes a public nuisance.Section 10 11. Enforcement orders.(a) Issuance of orders.--Except as modified by subsections (b), (c) and (d), the department may issue orders necessary to prevent or restrain a violation of this act or rules, regulations, standards, orders or permits adopted or issued under this act or to restrain the maintenance or threat of a 20250HB2076PN3176 - 24 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public nuisance or to prevent a reasonable likelihood of unlawful conduct or conduct causing immediate and irreparable harm to the public. An order issued under this act shall take effect upon notice, unless the order specifies otherwise. The power of the department to issue an order under this act is in addition to any other remedy available to the department under this act or under any other law.(b) Suspension and revocation.--(1) The department may suspend a well permit for any well:(i) in continuing violation of any of the following:(A) this act;(B) the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law;(C) the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act; or(D) any other statute administered by the department; or(ii) if the likely result of a violation is an unsafe operation or environmental damage.(2) A suspension order of the department shall automatically terminate if the violation upon which the suspension order is based is corrected by the operator to the satisfaction of the department in order to bring the well into compliance with this act.(3) The department may revoke a well permit for any well suspended under paragraph (1) if the violation is egregious, repeated or impossible to resolve or if the permittee is unable to comply with the steps necessary to resolve the violation.20250HB2076PN3176 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Written notice.--Prior to a suspension or revocation order of a well permit under subsection (a), the department shall serve written notice on the well operator or its agent, stating specifically the statutory provision, regulation or other reason relied upon, along with factual circumstances surrounding the alleged violation. If the department suspends or revokes the permit or registration, the department may order the operator to plug the well if the likely result of the violation is an unsafe operation or environmental damage.(d) Immediate orders.--An order of the department requiring immediate cessation of drilling operations shall be effective only if authorized by the secretary or a designee.(e) Grievances.--A person aggrieved by a final department order issued under this section shall have the right, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, to appeal to the Environmental Hearing Board.Section 11 12. Restraining violations.(a) Remedies.--(1) In addition to any other remedy provided in this act, the department may institute a suit in equity in the name of the Commonwealth for an injunction to restrain a violation of this act or rules, regulations, standards or orders adopted or issued under this act and to restrain the maintenance or threat of a public nuisance.(2) Upon motion of the Commonwealth, the court shall issue a prohibitory or mandatory preliminary injunction if the court finds that the defendant is engaging in unlawful conduct, as defined by this act, or conduct causing immediate and irreparable harm to the public.(3) The Commonwealth shall not be required to furnish 20250HB2076PN3176 - 26 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bond or other security in connection with the proceeding.(4) In addition to an injunction, the court in equity may level civil penalties as specified in section 12.(b) District attorney.--In addition to other remedies in this act, upon relation of the district attorney of a county affected or upon relation of the solicitor of a municipality affected, an action in equity may be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction for an injunction to restrain a violation of this act or rules and regulations promulgated under this act or to restrain a public nuisance or detriment to health.(c) Concurrent penalties.--Penalties and remedies under this act shall be deemed concurrent. Existence or exercise of one remedy shall not prevent the department from exercising another remedy at law or in equity.(d) Jurisdiction.--Actions under this section may be filed in the appropriate court of common pleas or in Commonwealth Court and those courts are granted jurisdiction to hear actions under this section.Section 12 13. Civil penalties.In addition to other remedies available at law or in equity for a violation of this act, a regulation of the department, a departmental order or a permit condition, the department may assess a civil penalty regardless of whether the violation was willful. The following shall apply:(1) The penalty shall not exceed $50,000 plus $2,000 for each day during which time the violation continues.(2) In determining the amount, the department shall consider willfulness of the violation, damage or injury to natural resources of this Commonwealth or their uses, endangerment of safety of others, the cost of remedying the 20250HB2076PN3176 - 27 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 harm, savings resulting to the violator as a result of the violation and any other relevant factor.(3) When the department proposes to assess a civil penalty, the department shall notify the person of the proposed amount of the penalty.(4) The person charged with the penalty must, within 30 days of notification, pay the proposed penalty in full or file an appeal of the assessment with the Environmental Hearing Board.(5) Failure to comply with the time period under this section shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty.(6) The civil penalty shall be payable to the Commonwealth and collectible in any manner provided at law for the collection of debts.(7) If a violator neglects or refuses to pay the penalty after demand, the amount, together with interest and costs that may accrue, shall become a lien in favor of the Commonwealth on the real and personal property of the violator but only after the lien has been entered and docketed of record by the prothonotary of the county where the property is situated.(8) The department may transmit to the prothonotaries of the various counties certified copies of all liens.(9) Each prothonotary shall enter and docket the liens of record in the prothonotary's office and index them as judgments are indexed, without requiring payment of costs as a condition precedent to entry.Section 13 14. Existing rights and remedies preserved and cumulative remedies authorized.20250HB2076PN3176 - 28 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nothing in this act prohibits the Commonwealth or a district attorney from proceeding in a court of law or in equity to abate pollution forbidden under this act or a nuisance under existing law. It is declared to be the purpose of this act to provide additional and cumulative remedies to control activities related to drilling for or production of geothermal resources in this Commonwealth and nothing contained in this act abridges or alters rights of action or remedies existing, or which existed previously, in equity or under common or statutory law, criminal or civil. Neither this act, the grant of a permit under this act nor an act done by virtue of this act prohibits the Commonwealth, in exercising rights under common or decisional law or in equity, from suppressing a nuisance, abating pollution or enforcing common law or statutory rights. No court of this Commonwealth with jurisdiction to abate public or private nuisances shall be deprived of jurisdiction in an action to abate a private or public nuisance instituted by any person on grounds that the nuisance constitutes air or water pollution.Section 14 15. Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Geothermal Energy Development Fund is established as a separate fund within the State Treasury.(b) Administration.--The department shall administer the fund.(c) Use of fund.--The fund shall be used for:(1) the operation and implementation of this act;(2) defraying the department's expenses associated with processing permit applications;(3) regulating geothermal operations and their facilities in this Commonwealth; and(4) decommissioning improperly abandoned facilities.20250HB2076PN3176 - 29 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Interest.--Interest earned by the fund shall be deposited into the fund.(e) Bond forfeitures.--Forfeited bonds and other financial security instruments shall be deposited into the fund.(f) Transfer.--Money in the fund may not be transferred to the General Fund or another fund.(g) Penalties.--Penalties imposed for violations of this act or regulations promulgated under this act and funds received by the department from financial responsibility mechanisms shall be remitted to the fund.(h) Fees.--All fees collected by the department under this act shall be deposited into the fund.(i) Appropriation.--Money in the fund shall be annually appropriated by the General Assembly.Section 15 16. Temporary transition rule.Until the Environmental Quality Board promulgates regulations in accordance with section 6 of this act or December 31, 2030, whichever is earlier, the department:(1) shall continue to treat geothermal wells as wells under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 (relating to development);(2) may require geothermal energy projects to seek permits for applicable geothermal wells under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 as either conventional or unconventional wells, as the department determines to be appropriate, notwithstanding that the department shall require any geothermal well stimulated by hydraulic fracturing to seek an unconventional well permit under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32; and(3) may require geothermal energy projects seeking permits for applicable geothermal wells under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 to comply with modified permit conditions to reflect the 20250HB2076PN3176 - 30 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 differences between geothermal wells and oil and gas wells.SECTION 17. CONSTRUCTION.NOTHING IN THIS ACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AMEND OR MODIFY THE PROVISIONS OR REGULATIONS PROMULGATED UNDER 58 PA.C.S. CH. 32 (RELATING TO DEVELOPMENT).Section 16 18. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2076PN3176 - 31 - <--<--1234567